
−DIAGNOSTICS AUTOMATICTRANSMISSION(A750F for2UZ −FE)
DI−55

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC P075 1 ShiftSolenoid”A”Performance
(ShiftSolenoidValveS 1)

DTC P0756 Shift Solenoid ”B” Performance
(Shift Solenoid Valve S2)

SYSTEM DESCRIPTION
The Engine and ECT ECU uses signals from the vehicle speed sensor and direct clutch speed sensor to
detect theactualgear range( 1st,2nd,3rd,4thor5thgear).Then theEngineandECTECUcompares the
actual gear with the shift schedule in the Engine and ECT ECU memory to detect mechanical troubles of
the shift solenoid valves, valve body or automatic transmission (clutch, brake or gear etc.).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0751

The gear requiredb y theEn gineandECTECUdoesnot

SShift solenoidvalveS 1 isstuckopenorclosed
SValvebody isblockeduporstuck
SAutomatic transmission (clutch,brakeorgearetc.)

P0756

The gear required by the Engine andECT ECU does not
match theactualgearwhendriving (2 −tripdetection logic) SShift solenoidvalveS2 isstuckopenorclosed

SValvebody isblockeduporstuck
SAutomatic transmission (clutch,brakeorgearetc.)

DIAUP−01



D11991

D11992
D13058

Shift solenoid S1:

Shift solenoid S2:

(+)(−)

(+)(−)

DI−56
−DIAGNOSTICS AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A750F for 2UZ−FE)

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check shift solenoid valve S1 or S2 operation.

PREPARATION:
(a) Jack up the vehicle.
(b) Remove the oil pan.
(c) Remove the shift solenoid valve S1 or S2.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the solenoid connector termi-
nal and the body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 11 − 1 5 � at 20˚ C (68˚ F)
CHECK:
Connect the battery positive lead to the solenoid connector ter-
m inal and t he bat t er y negat ive lead t o t he s olenoid body
ground.
OK:

Solenoid sounds operation noise.

NG Replace shift solenoid valve S1 or S2 (See page
AT−8) .

OK

2 Check valve body (See page DI−26).

NG Repair or replace valve body (See page
AT−8) .

OK

Repair or replace transmission
(See page AT−31).


